Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-1] Title. This chapter shall be
known and may be cited as the "Nursing Facility Sustainability
Program Act". [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 142, §3; am L
2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next